Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Article 3. Oyster Records and Resource User Fees

§ 28.2-538.
Record of oysters handled; penalty.

All licensed oyster harvesters, buyers, shucking houses, and aquaculture operations shall record all fisheries data and information required by the Commission as provided in §

28.2-204

. Such records shall be open for inspection by the Commissioner and a copy available to him or any employee designated by him to inspect or receive the same. A failure to keep such a record is a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-100; 1960, c. 517; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-87; 1966, c. 684; 1975, c. 199; 1976, c. 255; 1988, c. 313; 1992, c. 836; 2013, c. 38.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 38 substituted “harvesters, buyers, shucking houses, and aquaculture operations shall record all fisheries data and information required by the Commission as provided in §

28.2-204

” for “buyers, planters, packers, importers of shucking stock or shippers shall keep accurate and itemized records, on forms issued by the Commission, which contain (i) the number of bushels of oysters, before shucking, that come from public grounds, private grounds, or are imported; (ii) the name of the person from whom the oysters were purchased or obtained; (iii) the number of bushels and price paid per bushel for each seller; and (iv) if from public grounds, the grounds’ general area. Any seller accepting cash payment for his oysters shall sign an acknowledgment of the transaction and receive a copy of the acknowledgment from the buyer.”

§§ 28.2-539,
28.2-540.
Repealed by Acts 2013, c. 38, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former
§

28.2-539

, pertaining to Inspection tax, was derived from Code 1950, § 28-100; 1960, c. 517; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-87; 1966, c. 684; 1975, c. 199; 1976, c. 255; 1988, c. 313; 1992, c. 836; 1994, c. 120; 1996, c. 483; 1998, c. 98; 2006, c. 33.

Former § 28.2-540, pertaining to who pays inspection tax and the schedule for payment of inspection tax, derived from Code 1950, § 28-100; 1960, c. 517; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-87; 1966, c. 684; 1975, c. 199; 1976, c. 255; 1988, c. 313; 1992, c. 836; 1993, c. 218.

§ 28.2-541.
Oyster resource user fees.

There are imposed upon all oysters taken from the public rocks, beds, or shoals the following oyster resource user fees, per year: (i) on any licensed commercial fisherman harvesting oysters by hand, a fee of $50; (ii) on the use of any type of gear to harvest oysters, a fee of $300; (iii) on any business shucking or packing (a) no more than 1,000 gallons of oysters, a fee of $500; (b) more than 1,000 but no more than 10,000 gallons of oysters, a fee of $1,000; (c) more than 10,000 but no more than 25,000 gallons of oysters, a fee of $2,000; and (d) more than 25,000 gallons of oysters, a fee of $4,000; and (iv) on any oyster buyer using (1) a single truck or location, a fee of $100 and (2) multiple trucks or locations, a fee of $300.

Any commercial aquaculture operation taking oysters pursuant to §

28.2-603

from a riparian assignment or general oyster planting ground shall pay an oyster resource user fee of $50.

Any harvester shall pay only one oyster resource user fee per year for oyster gear used under clause (ii) of subsection A.

The Commission may revoke the permit or license of any person who fails to comply with this section.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-137.1; 1952, c. 650; 1954, c. 663; 1960, c. 517; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-93; 1964, c. 393; 1966, c. 173; 1978, c. 583; 1983, c. 18; 1988, c. 313; 1992, c. 836; 2013, c. 38.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 38 rewrote the section.

§ 28.2-542.
Oyster Replenishment Fund.

All oyster resource user fees collected by the Commission shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the Oyster Replenishment Fund, to be used only for administration of the program and for replenishment, planting, and replanting the public oyster rocks, beds, and shoals of the Commonwealth, with seed oysters, oyster shells, or other material that will catch, support, and grow oysters. These funds shall be withdrawn and expended for such purposes on the order of the Commission. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrant of the Comptroller issued on vouchers signed by persons designated by the Commission.

History.

1962, cc. 406, 636, §§ 28.1-94, 28.1-94.1; 1992, c. 836; 2013, c. 38.

Cross references.

For certain royalties and fees which are credited to the fund, see §§

28.2-1206

,

28.2-1208

.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 38 substituted “resource user fees” for “replenishment taxes” and “to the Oyster Replenishment Fund” for “to a special Public Oyster Rocks Replenishment Fund” and made minor stylistic changes in the first sentence, substituted “purposes” for “purpose” in the second sentence.

§§ 28.2-543,
28.2-544.
Repealed by Acts 2013, c. 38, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

28.2-543

, pertaining to payment of replenishment tax and payment schedule, derived from Code 1950, § 28-137.1; 1952, c. 650; 1954, c. 663; 1960, c. 517; 1962, c. 406, §§ 28.1-92, 28.1-93; 1964, c. 393; 1966, c. 173; 1970, c. 726; 1976, c. 255; 1978, c. 583; 1983, c. 18; 1988, c. 313; 1992, c. 836.

Former § 28.2-544, pertaining to reports required of oyster buyers, derived from Code 1950, § 28-137.1; 1952, c. 650; 1954, c. 663; 1960, c. 517; 1962, c. 406, §§ 28.1-92, 28.1-93, 28.1-94; 1964, c. 393; 1966, c. 173; 1970, c. 726; 1976, c. 255; 1978, c. 583; 1983, c. 18; 1988, c. 313; 1992, c. 836.

§ 28.2-545.
Reserved.

§ 28.2-546.
Permit to carry oysters out of state.

It shall be unlawful for any person to carry, attempt to carry, or buy for the purpose of carrying out of the Commonwealth any seed oysters taken from the public rocks, beds, or shoals until he has first obtained for each cargo a permit to do so from the Commission.

The permit shall state the name of the boat or license number of the motor vehicle and the name and address of the owner or captain of the boat or owner or operator of the motor vehicle. The permit shall state the name and address of the person to whom the cargo of oysters is to be delivered. The permit shall specify the number of bushels to be carried out of the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-110; 1960, c. 517; 1962, c. 406, §§ 28.1-89, 28.1-96; 1964, c. 393; 1966, cc. 252, 684; 1968, c. 747; 1976, c. 255; 1981, c. 52; 1992, c. 836; 2006, c. 33; 2013, c. 38.

Cross references.

For constitutional provision relating to natural oyster beds, etc., see Va. Const., Art. XI, § 3.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 33 substituted “Commission” for “officer” in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 38 rewrote subsection A, and in subsection B, substituted “to be carried out of the Commonwealth” for “and whether they are seed or shucking stock” at the end of the first paragraph and deleted the second paragraph.

§ 28.2-547.
Authority to inspect oysters when loaded on conveyance.

Any officer is authorized to inspect as to the quality, size and measure of any of the oysters taken or purchased, loaded on any boat, vessel, motor vehicle, or other conveyance, or sold to any person.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-101; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-88; 1992, c. 836.

§ 28.2-548.
Duty to inspect.

It shall be the duty of the officer in whose district a cargo of oysters is to be loaded to inspect the oysters as they are loaded and to ensure that all measurements are a full measure of oysters as defined in §

28.2-526

and that the oysters are properly culled.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 28-103, 28-105; 1954, c. 367; 1960, c. 517; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-90; 1992, c. 836; 2006, c. 33; 2013, c. 38.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 33 deleted the clause (i) designation and “and (ii) when such oysters are loaded to collect the inspection tax if due and payable to the Commonwealth” from the end of the first sentence, added the second sentence and deleted the former second paragraph which read: “On or before the fifth day of each month the officer shall render a statement to the Commissioner; on forms furnished by the Commissioner, showing the amounts collected and from whom collected.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 38 deleted the former second through fifth sentences which read “The oyster inspection tax shall be paid to the Commission and deposited in the Public Oyster Rocks Replenishment Fund established by §

28.2-542

. The officer shall furnish the owner, captain, or operator of such boat, vessel, or motor vehicle a receipt showing the date, the destination, the number of bushels, and the amount of tax paid. This receipt shall be carried by the captain or operator of the boat, vessel, or motor vehicle and shall be exhibited when requested by any officer. A copy of the receipt shall be sent to the Commissioner.”

§ 28.2-549.
Violations; recovery of oyster resource user fees; penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this article is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Any person willfully failing to pay oyster resource user fees to the Commission in the manner required by this article is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. The Commission may maintain an action at law against any person required to pay oyster resource user fees to the Commission for the amount of oyster resource user fees due, plus interest, and a penalty to be added to the oyster resource user fees in the amount of six percent if the failure is for not more than one month, with an additional six percent for each additional month, or fraction thereof, during which the failure continues, not to exceed 30 percent in the aggregate.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-109; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-95; 1988, c. 313; 1992, c. 836; 2013, c. 38.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 38 substituted “oyster resource user fees” for “such taxes” in the first sentence; substituted “oyster resource user fees” for “taxes” twice, and for “tax” once, in the second sentence, and made a minor stylistic change therein.

§ 28.2-550.
Authority of Commissioner to make certain contracts; funds received to be paid into Oyster Replenishment Fund.

The Commissioner, with the approval of the Commission, may contract with any person to take or dredge submerged oyster shells or any other subaqueous materials from the tidal waters of the Commonwealth, and shall have the authority to plant, use, or sell such shells or other materials in whatever manner the Commission deems to be in the best interest of the Commonwealth.

The Commissioner, with the approval of the Commission, may contract with any commercial fisherman to engage in replenishment, research, and stock assessment activities in the Commonwealth. The Commission may promulgate regulations establishing criteria for awarding such contracts, including a preference for commercial fishermen actively engaged in the taking or catching of fish or shellfish who have suffered an adverse economic impact resulting from the implementation of regulations of the Commission regulating the seafood and marine resources of the Commonwealth. In determining whether a person is a commercial fisherman actively engaged in the taking or catching of fish or shellfish, the Commission shall consider, among other relevant evidence, (i) his possession of a license issued pursuant to Article 1 (§

28.2-500

et seq.) or (ii) his voluntary reporting of shellfish catches to the Commission.

The Commission, when it makes a determination in writing that competitive bidding or competitive negotiation is not feasible or fiscally advantageous to the Commonwealth, may authorize other methods of purchasing and contracting for seed oysters, house shells, reef shells, shell bed turning, or other goods and services for oyster ground replenishment, including contracts with commercial fishermen for replenishment, research, and stock assessment activities as provided in subsection B, which are in the best interest of the Commonwealth and which are fair and impartial to suppliers. It may establish pricing for its awards and purchases; use selection methods by lot; and open, close, and revise its purchases according to changing conditions of the natural resources, markets, and sources of supply.

History.

1962, c. 636, § 28.1-94.1; 1989, c. 428; 1992, c. 836; 1994, c. 541; 2013, c. 38.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 38 deleted “of this chapter” following “Article 1 (§

28.2-500

et seq.)” in clause (i) of the last sentence of subsection B and substituted “or” for “and” preceding “other goods or services” in the first sentence in subsection C.